Hawaii statutes.
§105-3 Permits revocable. Permits
under section 105-2 may be limited to hours, routes, purposes or character of
use, may extend to general classes of officers or employees, and may be
canceled or revoked at any time without notice. The burden of proof shall be
upon any officer or employee given a written permit under subdivisions (4) or
(5) of section 105-2 to prove, in any proceedings, that the officer or employee
had, at the time of so using, operating, or driving any such motor vehicle, an
unrevoked written permit to so use, operate, or drive the same. Likewise, the
burden of proof shall be upon any person conveyed in any such motor vehicle as
provided in subdivision (6), section 105-2 to prove, in any proceedings, that
the officer, or head of the department, commission, board, bureau, agency, or
instrumentality, controlling or possessing such motor vehicle certified to such
use and filed such certificate as required by subdivision (6). [L 1919, c 227,
pt of §1; RL 1945, pt of §462; am L 1949, c 389, pt of §1(a); RL 1955, §7-12;
HRS §105-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next